tr: İş ve Endüstri > Diş Hekimliği > Diş Sementi: Dolgu Diş Sementi; Astar Diş Sementi; Yapıştırma Diş Sementi; Geçici Diş Sementi
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Οδοντιατρική > Οδοντιατρικό τσιμέντο: Οδοντιατρικό τσιμέντο για εμφράξεις; Οδοντιατρικό τσιμέντο για επενδύσεις; Οδοντιατρικό τσιμέντο συγκόλλησης; Προσωρινό οδοντιατρικό τσιμέντο
en: Business & Industrial > Dentistry > Dental Cement: Filling Dental Cement; Lining Dental Cement; Luting Dental Cement; Temporary Dental Cement
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Tandheelkunde > Tandcement: Vullend tandcement; Voerend tandcement; Bevestigend tandcement; Tijdelijk tandcement
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Zahnmedizin > Zahnzement: Füllungszahnzement; Abdeckungszahnzement; Befestigungszahnzement; Temporärer Zahnzement
it: Commercio e industria > Odontoiatria > Cemento dentale: Cemento dentale di riempimento; Cemento dentale di rivestimento; Cemento dentale per fissaggio; Cemento dentale temporaneo
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Zubné lekárstvo > Zubný cement: Výplňový zubný cement; Vložkový zubný cement; Tmeliaci zubný cement; Dočasný zubný cement
da: Erhverv og industri > Tandlæge > Tandcement: Fyldning af tandcement; Foring af tandcement; Polering af tandcement; Midlertidig tandcement
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Stomatologija > Zubni cement: Punila za zubni cement; Stomatološki cement za podstavu; Cement za cementiranje zuba; Privremeni zubni cement
sv: Företag och industri > Tandläkararbete > Tandcement: Tandcementfyllning; Tandcementfoder; Tandcementlut; Temporärt tandcement
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Fogászat > Fogászati cement: Tömítő fogászati cement; Bélelő fogászati cement; Rögzítő fogászati cement; Ideiglenes fogászati cement
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 牙科 > 牙科用黏著劑: 充填牙科用黏著劑; 底墊牙科用黏著劑; 封黏牙科用黏著劑; 暫時牙科用黏著劑
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Zobozdravstvo > Zobozdravstveni cement: Zobozdravstveni cement za zalivke; Zobozdravstveni cement za obloge; Zobozdravstveni cement za pritrjevanje; Začasni cementi
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Stomatologia > Cement dentystyczny: Cement do wypełnień; Cement do podkładów; Cement do osadzania; Cement tymczasowy
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Стоматология > Стоматологичен цимент: Стоматологичен цимент за запълване; Стоматологичен цимент за подложки; Постоянен стоматологичен цимент; Временен стоматологичен цимент
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Odontologija > Dantų cementas: Dantų cementas plomboms; Dantų cementas įklotams; Lutingo dantų cementas; Laikinasis dantų cementas
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Hammashoito > Hammassementti: Hampaan täyttösementti; Hampaan pintasementti; Hampaan kiinnityssementti; Väliaikainen hammassementti
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 歯科 > 歯科用セメント: 歯科用セメント充填; 歯科用ライニングセメント; 歯科用ルーティングセメント; 歯科用テンポラリーセメント
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Стоматология > Стоматологические цементы: Стоматологический цемент для пломбирования; Стоматологический цемент для изолирующих прокладок; Стоматологический цемент для фиксации; Временный стоматологический цемент
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 牙科 > 牙科粘固剂: 填充牙科粘固剂; 衬腔牙科粘固剂; Luting 牙科粘固剂; 临时牙科粘固剂
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Médecine dentaire > Ciment dentaire: Ciment dentaire de remplissage; Ciment dentaire de revêtement; Ciment dentaire de scellement; Ciment dentaire temporaire
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Odontologia > Cimento odontológico: Cimento odontológico para preenchimento; Cimento odontológico para revestimento; Cimento odontológico para restauração; Cimento odontológico temporário
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Odontologia > Cimento dentário: Cimento dentário para preencher; Cimento dentário para cobrir; Cimento dentário para vedar; Cimento dentário temporário
es: Economía e industria > Odontología > Cemento dental: Cemento dental para empastes; Cemento dental para revestimiento; Cemento dental para fijación; Cemento dental temporal
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Nha khoa > Xi măng nha khoa: Xi măng trám răng; Xi măng trám lót; Xi măng gắn; Xi măng nha khoa tạm thời
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Stomatologie > Ciment dentar: Ciment dentar plombe; Ciment dentar căptușire; Ciment dentar pentru etanșare; Ciment dentar provizoriu
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > ทันตกรรม > ซีเมนต์ทันตกรรม: ซีเมนต์อุดฟัน; ซีเมนต์เคลือบฟัน; ซีเมนต์ทันตกรรมแบบกาวยึด; ซีเมนต์ทันตกรรมชั่วคราว
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Stomatologie > Zubní cement: Výplňový zubní cement; Podkladový zubní cement; Fixační zubní cement; Dočasný zubní cement
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 치과 > 치과용 시멘트: 충전용 치과용 시멘트; 라이닝용 치과용 시멘트; 루팅용 치과용 시멘트; 임시 치과용 시멘트
nb: Forretninger og industri > Odontologi > Tannsement: Tannfyllsement; Tannforingssement; Tannlutingssement; Midlertidig tannsement